Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.070

Rendering criminal assistance in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of rendering criminal assistance in the first degree if he or she renders criminal assistance to a person who has committed or is being sought for murder in the first degree or any class A felony or equivalent juvenile offense.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, rendering criminal assistance in the first degree is a class B felony.

(b) Rendering criminal assistance in the first degree is a gross misdemeanor if it is established by a preponderance of the evidence that the actor is a relative as defined in RCW 9A.76.060 and under the age of eighteen at the time of the offense.

[ 2010 c 255 s 1; 2003 c 53 s 83; 1982 1st ex.s. c 47 s 21; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.76.070.]

NOTES:

Short title—2010 c 255: "This act may be known and cited as Randy's law." [ 2010 c 255 s 2.]

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 47: See note following RCW 9.41.190.